el: Σύστημα ήχου: Hi-Fi Mono; Hi-Fi Stereo; Γραμμικό στέρεο; Μονοφωνικός; Στέρεο; Άλλο
ja: オーディオシステム: Hi-Fiモノラル; Hi-Fiステレオ; リニアステレオ; モノ; ステレオ; その他
pt-PT: Sistema de áudio: Hi-Fi mono; Hi-Fi estéreo; Estéreo linear; Mono; Estéreo; Outro
zh-CN: 音频系统: 高保真单声道; 高保真立体声; 线性立体声; Mono; 立体声; 其他
nl: Audiosysteem: Hi-Fi mono; Hi-Fi stereo; Lineaire stereo; Mono; Stereo; Andere
vi: Hệ thống âm thanh: Hi-Fi đơn âm; Hi-Fi âm thanh nổi; Âm thanh nổi tuyến tính; Đơn âm; Âm thanh nổi; Khác
nb: Lydsystem: Hi-Fi mono; Hi-Fi stereo; Lineær stereo; Mono; Stereo; Annet
bg-BG: Аудиосистема: Hi-Fi моно; Hi-Fi стерео; Линейно стерео; Моно; Стерео; Други
cs: Audio systém: Hi-Fi mono; Hi-Fi stereo; Lineární stereo; Mono; Stereo; Jiné
fi: Äänijärjestelmä: Hi-Fi mono; Hi-Fi stereo; Lineaarinen stereo; Mono; Stereo; Muu
it: Sistema audio: Hi-Fi mono; Hi-Fi stereo; Stereo lineare; Mono; Stereo; Altro
hr-HR: Audio sustav: Hi-Fi mono; Hi-Fi stereo; Linearni stereo; Mono; Stereo; Ostalo
sl-SI: Avdio sistem: Hi-Fi mono; Hi-Fi stereo; Linearni stereo; Mono; Stereo; Drugo
ko: 오디오 시스템: 하이파이 모노; 하이파이 스테레오; 리니어 스테레오; 모노; 스테레오; 기타
sv: Ljudsystem: Hi-Fi mono; Hi-Fi stereo; Linjär stereo; Mono; Stereo; Övrigt
en: Audio system: Hi-Fi Mono; Hi-Fi Stereo; Linear Stereo; Mono; Stereo; Other
de: Audiosystem: Hi-Fi Mono; Hi-Fi Stereo; Linear-Stereo; Mono; Stereo; Sonstiges
zh-TW: 音訊系統: Hi-Fi 單聲道; Hi-Fi 立體聲; 線性立體聲; 單; 立體聲; 其他
tr: Ses sistemi: Hi-Fi Mono; Hi-Fi Stereo; Doğrusal Stereo; Mono; Stereo; Diğer
ru: Аудиосистема: Hi-Fi моно; Hi-Fi стерео; Линейное стерео; Одноканальный; Стерео; Другой
sk-SK: Zvukový systém: Hi-Fi mono; Hi-Fi stereo; Lineárne stereo; Mono; Stereo; Iné
da: Lydsystem: Hi-Fi mono; Hi-Fi stereo; Lineær stereo; Mono; Stereo; Andet
es: Sistema de audio: Hi-Fi mono; Hi-Fi estéreo; Estéreo lineal; Mono; Estéreo; Otros
ro-RO: Sistem audio: Hi-Fi mono; Hi-Fi stereo; Stereo liniar; Mono; Stereo; Altele
lt-LT: Garso sistema: Hi-Fi mono; Hi-Fi stereo; Linijinis stereo; Mono; Stereo; Kita
pt-BR: Sistema de áudio: Hi-Fi mono; Hi-Fi estéreo; Estéreo linear; Mono; Estéreo; Outro
hu: Hangrendszer: Hi-Fi mono; Hi-Fi sztereó; Lineáris sztereó; Monó; Sztereó; Egyéb
fr: Système audio: Mono Hi-Fi; Stéréo Hi-Fi; Stéréo linéaire; Mono; Stéréo; Autre
pl: System audio: Hi-Fi mono; Hi-Fi stereo; Stereo liniowe; Mono; Stereo; Inne
th: ระบบเสียง: ไฮไฟโมโน; ไฮไฟสเตอริโอ; ลิเนียร์สเตอริโอ; ทางเดียว; สเตอริโอ; อื่นๆ